Washington statutes.
RCW 2.16.020

Officers.

The judges shall elect from their number a president, who shall be called president judge, and a secretary, who shall hold their offices from the date of one annual meeting of the association to the next.

[ 1955 c 38 s 7; 1933 ex.s. c 58 s 2; RRS s 11051-2.]